Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4210
Insurer, defined.

Insurer means any insurance company as defined in section 44-103 or health maintenance organization as defined in section 44-32,105 authorized to transact health insurance business in the State of Nebraska.

Laws 1985, LB 391, § 10;

Laws 1989, LB 92, § 267;

Laws 1990, LB 1136, § 104;

Laws 2000, LB 1253, § 14.